src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Faire
+V+Inf:faire # ;
+V+Inf:feire # ;
+V+Inf:fere # ;
+V+Part+Pres:faisent # ;
+V+Part+Pres:feisent # ;
+V+Part+Pres:fesent # ;
+V+Part+Past:fait PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:feit PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:fet PartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:faz # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:fai # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:faiz # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:fei # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:fais # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:feis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:fait # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:feit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:faimes # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:faisons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:faites # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:font # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:funt # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fi # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fe # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fis # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fes # ;
+V+1s+SPast+Ind:fesis # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:fisis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:fist # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:fest # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:fesist # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:fisimes # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:fesimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:fisistes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:fesistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:fisent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:fesent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:firent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:faiseie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:faiseies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:faiseit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:faisiiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:faisons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:faisiiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:faissez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:faisent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:faiseient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:ferai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:feras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:fera%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:ferons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:ferez # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:ferent # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:feront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:face # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:faces # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:face%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:faciest # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:faciens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:façons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:faciez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:facent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesisst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesissons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesissez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:fesissent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:ferais # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:ferais # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:ferait # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:feroit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:ferions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:feriez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:feraient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:fai # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:faisons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:faisez # ;

LEXICON Dire
+V+Inf:dire # ;
+V:dis PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:dit PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:dict PartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:di # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:dis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:dit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:dimes # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:dions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:disons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:dites # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:dient # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:di # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:disis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:dist # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:disimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:distes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:disent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:diseie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:diseies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:diseit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:disiiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:disons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:disiiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Late:dissez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind+Gram/Early:disent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:diseient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:dirai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:diras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:dira%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:dirons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:direz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:dirent # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:diront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:die # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:dies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:diet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:diest # ; ! plural?
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:diiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:dions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:diiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:disiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:dient # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:desisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:desisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:desisst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:desissons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:desissez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:desissent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:dirais # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:dirais # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:dirait # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:diroit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:dirions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:diriez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:diraient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:di # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:disons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:disez # ;

LEXICON Devoir
+V+Inf:deveir # ;
+V:dev PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:deü # ;
+V+Part+Past:deubz # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:dei # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:deis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:deit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:devons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:devez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:devent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:dui # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:deüs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:deü%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:dü%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:deümes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:deüstes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:durent # ;

! Mostly guesses
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:deveie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:deveies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:deveit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:deviiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:deviions # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:deviiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:deveient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:devrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:devras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:devra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:devrames # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:devrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:devreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:devront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:deie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:deive # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:deies # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:deives # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:deiet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:deivet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:deiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:devons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:deiiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:devez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:deient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:deivent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüsse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüsse # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüsst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüssiiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüsseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:deüssent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:devreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:devreis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:devreit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:devriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:devriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:devreient # ;

! +V+2s+Pres+Imp:? # ; ! Unknown
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:devons # ; ! Verify
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:devez # ;
